ja: 荷台ネット伸縮タイプ: 張力調整可能; ゴム/ストレッチ; 伸縮性なし; その他
nb: Lastenett stretchtype: Justerbar stramming; Elastisk / stretch; Uten stretch; Annet
de: Dehnbarkeit des Laderaumnetzes: Verstellbare Spannung; Elastisch / Stretch; Nicht dehnbar; Sonstige
lt-LT: Krovinio tinklo tamprumo tipas: Reguliuojamas įtempimas; Elastinis / tamprus; Netamprus; Kita
cs: Typ roztažnosti sítě do zavazadlového prostoru: Nastavitelné napnutí; Elastické / strečové; Pevné (nestrečové); Jiné
da: Type af stræk i lastnet: Justerbar spænding; Elastisk/stræk; Uden stræk; Andet
sv: Lastnätets stretchtyp: Justerbar spänning; Elastiskt/stretch; Utan stretch; Annat
hu: Raktérháló rugalmassági típusa: Állítható feszességű; Rugalmas / sztreccs; Nem rugalmas; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ elastickej siete na batožinu: Nastaviteľné napnutie; Elastické/strečové; Nepružné; Iné
zh-CN: 后备箱网兜伸缩类型: 可调节张力; 弹力/拉伸; 无弹力; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de întindere plasă de marfă: Tensiune ajustabilă; Elastic / extensibil; Inextensibil; Altele
it: Rete elastica per carico: Tensione regolabile; Elastico / elasticizzato; Non elasticizzato; Altro
bg-BG: Тип разтегливост на товарната мрежа: Регулируемо обтягане; Еластична/разтеглива; Неразтеглива; Друго
vi: Loại co giãn của lưới chở hàng: Độ căng có thể điều chỉnh; Đàn hồi / co giãn; Không co giãn; Khác
pl: Typ rozciągliwości siatki transportowej: Regulowany naciąg; Elastyczna / rozciągliwa; Nierozciągliwa; Inne
fr: Type d’élasticité du filet de chargement: Tension ajustable; Élastique / extensible; Non extensible; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta raztegljive tovorne mreže: Prilagodljiva napetost; Elastično / raztegljivo; Neraztegljivo; Drugo
fi: Tavaraverkon venyvyystyyppi: Säädettävä kireys; Joustava / venyvä; Venymätön; Muu
th: ตาข่ายบรรทุกสินค้าแบบยืดหยุ่น: ความตึงปรับได้; ยางยืด / ยืดหยุ่น; ไม่ยืด; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de elasticidade da rede de carga: Tensão ajustável; Elástica / stretch; Sem stretch; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de elástico da rede de carga: Tensão ajustável; Elástico/extensível; Não extensível; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta rastezljive mreže za teret: Podesiva napetost; Elastično / rastezljivo; Nerastezljivo; Ostalo
es: Tipo de elasticidad de la red de carga: Tensión ajustable; Elástica / elástico; No elástica; Otro
zh-TW: 捆貨網彈性類型: 可調式張力; 彈性 / 伸縮; 非伸縮; 其他
en: Cargo net stretch type: Adjustable tension; Elastic / stretch; Non-stretch; Other
ru: Тип растяжимости багажной сетки: Регулируемое натяжение; Эластичный / тянущийся; Не тянущийся; Другое
ko: 화물망 신축성 유형: 조절 가능 텐션; 엘라스틱/스트레치; 논스트레치; 기타
tr: Yük ağı esneme tipi: Ayarlanabilir gerginlik; Elastik / esnek; Esnek olmayan; Diğer
el: Τύπος ελαστικού διχτυού φορτίου: Ρυθμιζόμενη τάση; Ελαστικό / stretch; Μη ελαστικό; Άλλο
nl: Laadnet type rekbaarheid: Verstelbare spanning; Elastisch / stretch; Niet-elastisch; Overige